work/esperanto.aff
flag *Q:	# I^G-verboj

    I >	^GI
    I >	^GAS
    I >	^GIS
    I >	^GOS
    I >	^GUS
    I >	^GU
    I	>	^GINTA
    I	>	^GINTAJ
    I	>	^GINTAJN
    I	>	^GINTAN
    I	>	^GINTE
    I	>	^GINT^'
    I	>	^GINTO
    I	>	^GINTOJ
    I	>	^GINTOJN
    I	>	^GINTON
    I	>	^GANTA
    I	>	^GANTAJ
    I	>	^GANTAJN
    I	>	^GANTAN
    I	>	^GANTE
    I	>	^GANT^'
    I	>	^GANTO
    I	>	^GANTOJ
    I	>	^GANTOJN
    I	>	^GANTON
    I	>	^GONTA
    I	>	^GONTAJ
    I	>	^GONTAJN
    I	>	^GONTAN
    I	>	^GONTE
    I	>	^GONT^'
    I	>	^GONTO
    I	>	^GONTOJ
    I	>	^GONTOJN
    I	>	^GONTON
   I	>	^GINTINA
    I	>	^GINTINAJ
    I	>	^GINTINAJN
    I	>	^GINTINAN
    I	>	^GINTIN^'
    I	>	^GINTINO
    I	>	^GINTINOJ
    I	>	^GINTINOJN
    I	>	^GINTINON
    I	>	^GANTINA
    I	>	^GANTINAJ
    I	>	^GANTINAJN
    I	>	^GANTINAN
    I	>	^GANTIN^'
    I	>	^GANTINO
    I	>	^GANTINOJ
    I	>	^GANTINOJN
    I	>	^GANTINON
    I	>	^GONTINA
    I	>	^GONTINAJ
    I	>	^GONTINAJN
    I	>	^GONTINAN
    I	>	^GONTIN^'
    I	>	^GONTINO
    I	>	^GONTINOJ
    I	>	^GONTINOJN
    I	>	^GONTINON
    I	>	^GA
    I	>	^GAJ
    I	>	^GAJN
    I	>	^GAN
    I	>	^GE
    I	>	^G^'
    I	>	^GO
    I	>	^GOJ
    I	>	^GOJN
    I	>	^GON
    I	>	^GEMA
    I	>	^GEMAJ
    I	>	^GEMAJN
    I	>	^GEMAN
    I	>	^GEME
    I	>	^GEM^'
    I	>	^GEMO
    I	>	^GEMOJ
    I	>	^GEMOJN
    I	>	^GEMON
    I	>	^GADA
    I	>	^GADAJ
    I	>	^GADAJN
    I	>	^GADAN
    I	>	^GADE
    I	>	^GAD^'
    I	>	^GADO
    I	>	^GADOJ
    I	>	^GADOJN
    I	>	^GADON
    I >	^GADI
    I >	^GADAS
    I >	^GADIS
    I >	^GADOS
    I >	^GADUS
    I >	^GADU

    U >	-U,I^GI
    U >	-U,I^GAS
    U >	-U,I^GIS
    U >	-U,I^GOS
    U >	-U,I^GUS
    U >	-U,I^GU
    U	>	-U,I^GINTA
    U	>	-U,I^GINTAJ
    U	>	-U,I^GINTAJN
    U	>	-U,I^GINTAN
    U	>	-U,I^GINTE
    U	>	-U,I^GINT^'
    U	>	-U,I^GINTO
    U	>	-U,I^GINTOJ
    U	>	-U,I^GINTOJN
    U	>	-U,I^GINTON
    U	>	-U,I^GANTA
    U	>	-U,I^GANTAJ
    U	>	-U,I^GANTAJN
    U	>	-U,I^GANTAN
    U	>	-U,I^GANTE
    U	>	-U,I^GANT^'
    U	>	-U,I^GANTO
    U	>	-U,I^GANTOJ
    U	>	-U,I^GANTOJN
    U	>	-U,I^GANTON
    U	>	-U,I^GONTA
    U	>	-U,I^GONTAJ
    U	>	-U,I^GONTAJN
    U	>	-U,I^GONTAN
    U	>	-U,I^GONTE
    U	>	-U,I^GONT^'
    U	>	-U,I^GONTO
    U	>	-U,I^GONTOJ
    U	>	-U,I^GONTOJN
    U	>	-U,I^GONTON
   U	>	-U,I^GINTINA
    U	>	-U,I^GINTINAJ
    U	>	-U,I^GINTINAJN
    U	>	-U,I^GINTINAN
    U	>	-U,I^GINTIN^'
    U	>	-U,I^GINTINO
    U	>	-U,I^GINTINOJ
    U	>	-U,I^GINTINOJN
    U	>	-U,I^GINTINON
    U	>	-U,I^GANTINA
    U	>	-U,I^GANTINAJ
    U	>	-U,I^GANTINAJN
    U	>	-U,I^GANTINAN
    U	>	-U,I^GANTIN^'
    U	>	-U,I^GANTINO
    U	>	-U,I^GANTINOJ
    U	>	-U,I^GANTINOJN
    U	>	-U,I^GANTINON
    U	>	-U,I^GONTINA
    U	>	-U,I^GONTINAJ
    U	>	-U,I^GONTINAJN
    U	>	-U,I^GONTINAN
    U	>	-U,I^GONTIN^'
    U	>	-U,I^GONTINO
    U	>	-U,I^GONTINOJ
    U	>	-U,I^GONTINOJN
    U	>	-U,I^GONTINON
    U	>	-U,I^GA
    U	>	-U,I^GAJ
    U	>	-U,I^GAJN
    U	>	-U,I^GAN
    U	>	-U,I^GE
    U	>	-U,I^G^'
    U	>	-U,I^GO
    U	>	-U,I^GOJ
    U	>	-U,I^GOJN
    U	>	-U,I^GON
    U	>	-U,I^GEMA
    U	>	-U,I^GEMAJ
    U	>	-U,I^GEMAJN
    U	>	-U,I^GEMAN
    U	>	-U,I^GEME
    U	>	-U,I^GEM^'
    U	>	-U,I^GEMO
    U	>	-U,I^GEMOJ
    U	>	-U,I^GEMOJN
    U	>	-U,I^GEMON
    U	>	-U,I^GADA
    U	>	-U,I^GADAJ
    U	>	-U,I^GADAJN
    U	>	-U,I^GADAN
    U	>	-U,I^GAD^'
    U	>	-U,I^GADO
    U	>	-U,I^GADOJ
    U	>	-U,I^GADOJN
    U	>	-U,I^GADON
    U >	-U,I^GADI
    U >	-U,I^GADAS
    U >	-U,I^GADIS
    U >	-U,I^GADOS
    U >	-U,I^GADUS
    U >	-U,I^GADU

    A >	-A,I^GI
    A >	-A,I^GAS
    A >	-A,I^GIS
    A >	-A,I^GOS
    A >	-A,I^GUS
    A >	-A,I^GU
    A	>	-A,I^GINTA
    A	>	-A,I^GINTAJ
    A	>	-A,I^GINTAJN
    A	>	-A,I^GINTAN
    A	>	-A,I^GINTE
    A	>	-A,I^GINT^'
    A	>	-A,I^GINTO
    A	>	-A,I^GINTOJ
    A	>	-A,I^GINTOJN
    A	>	-A,I^GINTON
    A	>	-A,I^GANTA
    A	>	-A,I^GANTAJ
    A	>	-A,I^GANTAJN
    A	>	-A,I^GANTAN
    A	>	-A,I^GANTE
    A	>	-A,I^GANT^'
    A	>	-A,I^GANTO
    A	>	-A,I^GANTOJ
    A	>	-A,I^GANTOJN
    A	>	-A,I^GANTON
    A	>	-A,I^GONTA
    A	>	-A,I^GONTAJ
    A	>	-A,I^GONTAJN
    A	>	-A,I^GONTAN
    A	>	-A,I^GONTE
    A	>	-A,I^GONT^'
    A	>	-A,I^GONTO
    A	>	-A,I^GONTOJ
    A	>	-A,I^GONTOJN
    A	>	-A,I^GONTON
   A	>	-A,I^GINTINA
    A	>	-A,I^GINTINAJ
    A	>	-A,I^GINTINAJN
    A	>	-A,I^GINTINAN
    A	>	-A,I^GINTIN^'
    A	>	-A,I^GINTINO
    A	>	-A,I^GINTINOJ
    A	>	-A,I^GINTINOJN
    A	>	-A,I^GINTINON
    A	>	-A,I^GANTINA
    A	>	-A,I^GANTINAJ
    A	>	-A,I^GANTINAJN
    A	>	-A,I^GANTINAN
    A	>	-A,I^GANTIN^'
    A	>	-A,I^GANTINO
    A	>	-A,I^GANTINOJ
    A	>	-A,I^GANTINOJN
    A	>	-A,I^GANTINON
    A	>	-A,I^GONTINA
    A	>	-A,I^GONTINAJ
    A	>	-A,I^GONTINAJN
    A	>	-A,I^GONTINAN
    A	>	-A,I^GONTIN^'
    A	>	-A,I^GONTINO
    A	>	-A,I^GONTINOJ
    A	>	-A,I^GONTINOJN
    A	>	-A,I^GONTINON
    A	>	-A,I^GA
    A	>	-A,I^GAJ
    A	>	-A,I^GAJN
    A	>	-A,I^GAN
    A	>	-A,I^GE
    A	>	-A,I^G^'
    A	>	-A,I^GO
    A	>	-A,I^GOJ
    A	>	-A,I^GOJN
    A	>	-A,I^GON
    A	>	-A,I^GEMA
    A	>	-A,I^GEMAJ
    A	>	-A,I^GEMAJN
    A	>	-A,I^GEMAN
    A	>	-A,I^GEME
    A	>	-A,I^GEM^'
    A	>	-A,I^GEMO
    A	>	-A,I^GEMOJ
    A	>	-A,I^GEMOJN
    A	>	-A,I^GEMON
    A	>	-A,I^GADA
    A	>	-A,I^GADAJ
    A	>	-A,I^GADAJN
    A	>	-A,I^GADAN
    A	>	-A,I^GADE
    A	>	-A,I^GAD^'
    A	>	-A,I^GADO
    A	>	-A,I^GADOJ
    A	>	-A,I^GADOJN
    A	>	-A,I^GADON
    A >	-A,I^GADI
    A >	-A,I^GADAS
    A >	-A,I^GADIS
    A >	-A,I^GADOS
    A >	-A,I^GADUS
    A >	-A,I^GADU
    O >	-O,I^GI
    O >	-O,I^GAS
    O >	-O,I^GIS
    O >	-O,I^GOS
    O >	-O,I^GUS
    O >	-O,I^GU
    O	>	-O,I^GINTA
    O	>	-O,I^GINTAJ
    O	>	-O,I^GINTAJN
    O	>	-O,I^GINTAN
    O	>	-O,I^GINTE
    O	>	-O,I^GINT^'
    O	>	-O,I^GINTO
    O	>	-O,I^GINTOJ
    O	>	-O,I^GINTOJN
    O	>	-O,I^GINTON
    O	>	-O,I^GANTA
    O	>	-O,I^GANTAJ
    O	>	-O,I^GANTAJN
    O	>	-O,I^GANTAN
    O	>	-O,I^GANTE
    O	>	-O,I^GANT^'
    O	>	-O,I^GANTO
    O	>	-O,I^GANTOJ
    O	>	-O,I^GANTOJN
    O	>	-O,I^GANTON
    O	>	-O,I^GONTA
    O	>	-O,I^GONTAJ
    O	>	-O,I^GONTAJN
    O	>	-O,I^GONTAN
    O	>	-O,I^GONTE
    O	>	-O,I^GONT^'
    O	>	-O,I^GONTO
    O	>	-O,I^GONTOJ
    O	>	-O,I^GONTOJN
    O	>	-O,I^GONTON
   O	>	-O,I^GINTINA
    O	>	-O,I^GINTINAJ
    O	>	-O,I^GINTINAJN
    O	>	-O,I^GINTINAN
    O	>	-O,I^GINTIN^'
    O	>	-O,I^GINTINO
    O	>	-O,I^GINTINOJ
    O	>	-O,I^GINTINOJN
    O	>	-O,I^GINTINON
    O	>	-O,I^GANTINA
    O	>	-O,I^GANTINAJ
    O	>	-O,I^GANTINAJN
    O	>	-O,I^GANTINAN
    O	>	-O,I^GANTIN^'
    O	>	-O,I^GANTINO
    O	>	-O,I^GANTINOJ
    O	>	-O,I^GANTINOJN
    O	>	-O,I^GANTINON
    O	>	-O,I^GONTINA
    O	>	-O,I^GONTINAJ
    O	>	-O,I^GONTINAJN
    O	>	-O,I^GONTINAN
    O	>	-O,I^GONTIN^'
    O	>	-O,I^GONTINO
    O	>	-O,I^GONTINOJ
    O	>	-O,I^GONTINOJN
    O	>	-O,I^GONTINON
    O	>	-O,I^GA
    O	>	-O,I^GAJ
    O	>	-O,I^GAJN
    O	>	-O,I^GAN
    O	>	-O,I^GE
    O	>	-O,I^G^'
    O	>	-O,I^GO
    O	>	-O,I^GOJ
    O	>	-O,I^GOJN
    O	>	-O,I^GON
    O	>	-O,I^GEMA
    O	>	-O,I^GEMAJ
    O	>	-O,I^GEMAJN
    O	>	-O,I^GEMAN
    O	>	-O,I^GEME
    O	>	-O,I^GEM^'
    O	>	-O,I^GEMO
    O	>	-O,I^GEMOJ
    O	>	-O,I^GEMOJN
    O	>	-O,I^GEMON
    O	>	-O,I^GADA
    O	>	-O,I^GADAJ
    O	>	-O,I^GADAJN
    O	>	-O,I^GADAN
    O	>	-O,I^GADE
    O	>	-O,I^GAD^'
    O	>	-O,I^GADO
    O	>	-O,I^GADOJ
    O	>	-O,I^GADOJN
    O	>	-O,I^GADON
    O >	-O,I^GADI
    O >	-O,I^GADAS
    O >	-O,I^GADIS
    O >	-O,I^GADOS
    O >	-O,I^GADUS
    O >	-O,I^GADU

flag S:		# no *: agordi/TSy > agordisto, sed ne misagordisto

    O	>	-O,ISTA
    O	>	-O,ISTAJ
    O	>	-O,ISTAJN
    O	>	-O,ISTAN
    O	>	-O,ISTE
    O	>	-O,IST^'
    O	>	-O,ISTO
    O	>	-O,ISTOJ
    O	>	-O,ISTOJN
    O	>	-O,ISTON		# atentu ISME > ISTO !!
    O	>	-O,ISTINA
    O	>	-O,ISTINAJ
    O	>	-O,ISTINAJN
    O	>	-O,ISTINAN
    O	>	-O,ISTINE
    O	>	-O,ISTIN^'
    O	>	-O,ISTINO
    O	>	-O,ISTINOJ
    O	>	-O,ISTINOJN
    O	>	-O,ISTINON
    A	>	-A,ISTA
    A	>	-A,ISTAJ
    A	>	-A,ISTAJN
    A	>	-A,ISTAN
    A	>	-A,ISTE
    A	>	-A,IST^'
    A	>	-A,ISTO
    A	>	-A,ISTOJ
    A	>	-A,ISTOJN
    A	>	-A,ISTON
    A	>	-A,ISTINA
    A	>	-A,ISTINAJ
    A	>	-A,ISTINAJN
    A	>	-A,ISTINAN
    A	>	-A,ISTINE
    A	>	-A,ISTIN^'
    A	>	-A,ISTINO
    A	>	-A,ISTINOJ
    A	>	-A,ISTINOJN
    A	>	-A,ISTINON

    O N	>	-ON,ISTA
    O N	>	-ON,ISTAJ
    O N	>	-ON,ISTAJN
    O N	>	-ON,ISTAN
    O N	>	-ON,ISTE
    O N	>	-ON,IST^'
    O N	>	-ON,ISTO
    O N	>	-ON,ISTOJ
    O N	>	-ON,ISTOJN
    O N	>	-ON,ISTON		# biblisciencon/ASX
    O N	>	-ON,ISTINA
    O N	>	-ON,ISTINAJ
    O N	>	-ON,ISTINAJN
    O N	>	-ON,ISTINAN
    O N	>	-ON,ISTINE
    O N	>	-ON,ISTIN^'
    O N	>	-ON,ISTINO
    O N	>	-ON,ISTINOJ
    O N	>	-ON,ISTINOJN
    O N	>	-ON,ISTINON

    I	>	STA
    I	>	STAJ
    I	>	STAJN
    I	>	STAN
    I	>	STE
    I	>	ST^'
    I	>	STO
    I	>	STOJ
    I	>	STOJN
    I	>	STON
    I	>	STINA
    I	>	STINAJ
    I	>	STINAJN
    I	>	STINAN
    I	>	STINE
    I	>	STIN^'
    I	>	STINO
    I	>	STINOJ
    I	>	STINOJN
    I	>	STINON

    I S M E	>	-ME,TA
    I S M E	>	-ME,TAJ
    I S M E	>	-ME,TAJN
    I S M E	>	-ME,TAN
    I S M E	>	-ME,TE
    I S M E	>	-ME,T^'
    I S M E	>	-ME,TO
    I S M E	>	-ME,TOJ
    I S M E	>	-ME,TOJN
    I S M E	>	-ME,TON	# kiel ^sovinisme > ^sovinisto
    I S M E	>	-ME,TINA
    I S M E	>	-ME,TINAJ
    I S M E	>	-ME,TINAJN
    I S M E	>	-ME,TINAN
    I S M E	>	-ME,TINE
    I S M E	>	-ME,TIN^'
    I S M E	>	-ME,TINO
    I S M E	>	-ME,TINOJ
    I S M E	>	-ME,TINOJN
    I S M E	>	-ME,TINON
    I S M E	>	-E,A
    I S M E	>	-E,AJ
    I S M E	>	-E,AJN
    I S M E	>	-E,AN
    I S M E	>	-E,^'
    I S M E	>	-E,O
    I S M E	>	-E,OJ
    I S M E	>	-E,OJN
    I S M E	>	-E,ON

    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTA
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTAJ
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTAJN
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTAN
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTE
    [^M] E	>	-E,IIST^'
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTO
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTOJ
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTOJN
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTON	# kiel bibliografe > bibliografiisto
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTINA
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTINAJ
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTINAJN
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTINAN
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTINE
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTIN^'
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTINO
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTINOJ
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTINOJN
    [^M] E	>	-E,IISTINON

    N O M E	>	-E,IISTA
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTAJ
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTAJN
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTAN
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTE
    N O M E	>	-E,IIST^'
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTO
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTOJ
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTOJN
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTON	# kiel astronome > astronomiisto
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTINA
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTINAJ
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTINAJN
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTINAN
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTINE
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTIN^'
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTINO
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTINOJ
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTINOJN
    N O M E	>	-E,IISTINON
